src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-ha_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:   ../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:   ../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - ha: # Verb
#    - keta: dormir
    keta+V+Inf: keta
    keta+V+Caus+Inf: baketa
    keta+V+Sg1: oketa
    keta+V+Sg2: eketa
    keta+V+Sg3: jaketa

#- reka: perder

    reka+V+Inf: reka
    reka+V+Caus+Inf: bareka
    reka+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oreka
    reka+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ereka
    reka+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jareka

#- ha: sorrir

    ha+V+Inf: ha
    ha+V+Caus+Inf: baha
    ha+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: oha
    ha+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: eha
    ha+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jaha

#- bopa: deitar

    bopa+V+Inf: bopa
    bopa+V+Caus+Inf: babopa
    bopa+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: obopa
    bopa+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ebopa
    bopa+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jabopa

#- nik: sentar

    nik+V+Inf: nik
    nik+V+Caus+Inf: banik
    nik+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: onik
    nik+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: enik
    nik+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: janik
